Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4469.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 405. This article does not prohibit an educational institution that provides educational services for any of grades K-12 and that is subject to title IX of the education amendments of 1972, 20 USC 1681 to 1688, from basing an individual's eligibility to participate in athletics on the individual's biological sex as listed on the individual's original birth certificate that was issued at or near the time of the individual's birth.